North Carolina, session 2025, HB806.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-47(10), 115C-105.26(b)(1), 115C-234.5(e),
115C-301(c), 115C-301(c1), 115C-301(g), and 115C-310.7(a) are repealed.
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-81.5(b)(8) reads as rewritten:
"(8) Class size recommendations and requirements.recommendations."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-105.37A(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Assistance to Schools That Are Low Performing for Two Years. – If a school that has
received State-mandated assistance is designated by the State Board as low performing for two
consecutive years or for two of three consecutive years, the State Board shall provide a series of
progressive assistance and intervention strategies to that school. These strategies shall be
designed to improve student achievement and to maintain student achievement at appropriate
levels and may include, to the extent that funds are available for this purpose, assistance such as
reductions in class size, extension of teacher and assistant principal contracts, extension of the
instructional year, and grant-based assistance."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-276(k) reads as rewritten:
"(k) To Submit Organization Reports and Other Information to the State Board. – Each
year the superintendent of each local school administrative unit shall submit to the State Board
of Education statistical reports, certified by the chairman of the board of education, showing the
organization of the schools in his or her unit and any additional information the State Board may
require. At the end of the second month of school each year, local boards of education, through
the superintendent, shall report school organization, employees' duties, and class sizes to the State
Board. As of February 1 each year, local boards of education, through the superintendent, shall
report all exceptions to individual class size maximums in kindergarten through third grade that
occur at that time."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 115C-301(f) reads as rewritten:
"(f) Biannual Reports. – At the end of October and end of February of each school year,
each local board of education, through the superintendent, shall file a report, based on
information provided by the principal, for each school within the local school administrative unit
with the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The report shall be filed in a format prescribed by
the Superintendent of Public Instruction and shall include the organization for each school in the
local school administrative unit, including the following information:
(1) For each class in each grade level at each school, the following:
*H806-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. The duties of the teacher.
b. The source of funds used to pay for the teacher.
c. The number of students assigned to the class, including all exceptions
to individual class size maximums in kindergarten through third grade
that exist at that time.class.
(2) For each school, the following:
a. The number of program enhancement teachers.
b. The source of funds used to pay each program enhancement teacher.
(3) The average class size for each grade from kindergarten through third grade
in the local school administrative unit.
(4) Any other information the Superintendent of Public Instruction may require.
The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall conduct periodic audits of the information
reported by the local superintendent under this subsection to confirm the accuracy of reporting
at the local school administrative unit and school level of the average and individual class size
for students in kindergarten through third grade. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction finds
that a local board of education is exceeding class size requirements without application to the
State Board for an allotment adjustment or a waiver of those class size requirements, the State
Board may impose the penalty set forth in subsection (j) of this section until such time the local
board of education receives a waiver or the schools in the unit meet the class size requirements
for kindergarten through third grade.unit."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-295 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-295. Minimum age and license prerequisites.
(a) All teachers employed in the public schools of the State or in schools receiving public
funds, shall be required either to hold or be qualified to hold a license in compliance with the
provision of the law or in accordance with the regulations of the State Board of Education:
Provided, that nothing herein shall prevent the employment of temporary personnel under such
rules as the State Board of Education may prescribe: Provided further, that no No person shall be
employed to teach who is under 18 years of age.
(b) It shall be unlawful for any board of education to employ or keep in service any
teacher who neither holds nor is qualified to hold a license in compliance with the provision of
the law or in accordance with the regulations of the State Board of Education.
(c) This section shall not prohibit the employment of individuals exempted from
licensure under G.S. 115C-270.21."
SECTION 2.(b) Article 20 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-295.4. Required teacher license quota.
(a) A local board of education may employ and contract with necessary teachers to
perform the particular service for which they are employed in the school, except for those
teachers employed pursuant to G.S. 115C-325. At least fifty percent (50%) of the teachers in a
school shall hold teacher licenses. All teachers who are teaching in the core subject areas of
mathematics, science, social studies, and language arts shall be college graduates.
(b) All teachers hired by a local board of education who are not licensed as a teacher by
the State shall complete preservice training, which may be offered through an educator
preparation program or by a local school administrative unit, in all of the following areas prior
to beginning instruction:
(1) The identification and education of children with disabilities.
(2) Positive management of student behavior.
(3) Effective communication for defusing and de-escalating disruptive or
dangerous behavior.
(4) Safe and appropriate use of seclusion and restraint."
Page 2 House Bill 806-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
House Bill 806-First Edition Page 3